Utah statutes.
17B-2a-211.   Penalty for wrongfully damaging a district work.

(1)  A person who wrongfully and purposely fills, cuts, injures, destroys, or impairs the usefulness of a drain, ditch, or other work of a drainage district is guilty of a class C misdemeanor.

(2)  Each person who negligently, wrongfully, or purposely fills, cuts, injures, destroys, or impairs the usefulness of a drain, ditch, levee, or other work of a drainage district or obstructs or fills any natural stream or outlet used by a drainage district, whether inside or outside the district, shall be liable to the district for all resulting damages.



Enacted by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

